src/propernoun-sma-morph.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Proper nouns morphology
! =======================

! Table of content
! ----------------
! Continuation lexica
! Personal names
!  First names
!  Surnames
! Place names
! ----------------


! Continuation lexica
! ===================

! Continuation lexica for personal names
! --------------------------------------


! At the moment, these continuation lexica are identical. But since I
! suspect that linguistic input will prove that the words behave
! differently, they are kept distinct.

! Names from Sweden


! Vowel final names
! - - - - - - - - -
LEXICON VNAME_ODD-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: VNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-PL-plc
VNAME_ODD-PL ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-PL-org
VNAME_ODD-PL ;


LEXICON VNAME_ODD-PL
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc:e%^DISIMP         RHyph ;
+N+Prop+Plc: VNAME_ODD ;


LEXICON VNAME_ODD-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: VNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: VNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-org
+N+Prop+Org: VNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: VNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: VNAME_ODD ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
:e%^DISIMP         RHyph ;
+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
   N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
:e%^DISIMP         RHyph ;
!+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
   N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;


LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-org
+N+Prop+Org: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-PL-plc
VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-PL ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH-PL
+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1 ;
+N+Prop+Plc: VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+Sg: N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH ;
:e         RHyph ;
+Pl: N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH ;
    N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VNAME_ODD_NO_DISIMPH_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+Sg: N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH ;
:e         RHyph ;
!+Pl: N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH ;
    N_ODD_ESS ;
+Attr:e FINAL1 ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG_NO_DISIMPH
  +Nom:e         FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL_NO_DISIMPH
  +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>i       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie FINAL1 ; !


!LEXICON VNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!+N+Prop+Plc+Sg: NIEJTE_SG ;
!+N+Prop+Plc:e          RHyph ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Plc:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Plc+Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VNAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: VNAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME-org
+N+Prop+Org: VNAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON VNAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: VNAME ;

LEXICON VNAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: VNAME ;

LEXICON VNAME-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: VNAME ;

LEXICON VNAME-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: VNAME ;

LEXICON VNAME-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: VNAME ;


LEXICON VNAME
 +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
           RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>jste    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:%>jgujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:%>jne         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr: FINAL1 ;
!SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Even syllable as default - rename using either VNAME_ODD, or
! the appropriate even syllable lexicons.

LEXICON VNAME_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
           RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ine:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ela:%>jste    FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Com:%>jgujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:%>jne         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr: FINAL1 ;
!SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Even syllable as default - rename using either VNAME_ODD, or
! the appropriate even syllable lexicons.

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: NYSTØ_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-org
+N+Prop+Org: NYSTØ_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Names ending in stressed vowel, typically scand. compounds 
+Attr: FINAL1 ;
          RHyph ;
+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
:    EVEN_ESS ;
+Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NYSTØ_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressed vowel, typically scand. compounds 
+Attr: FINAL1 ;
          RHyph ;
!+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
:    EVEN_ESS ;
+Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON INAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: INAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON INAME-org
+N+Prop+Org: INAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON INAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: INAME ;

LEXICON INAME-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: INAME ;

LEXICON INAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: INAME ;

LEXICON INAME-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: INAME ;

LEXICON INAME ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +Sg+Nom:i          FINAL1 ;
 :i          RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:i%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:i%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:i%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr:i FINAL1 ;

LEXICON INAME_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +Sg+Nom:i          FINAL1 ;
 :i          RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:i%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:i%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Nom:i%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr:i FINAL1 ;


LEXICON OENAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: OENAME ;



LEXICON OENAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: OENAME ;


LEXICON OENAME
 SNAME_NIEJTE ;


LEXICON ONAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: ONAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ONAME-org
+N+Prop+Org: ONAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ONAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: ONAME ;

LEXICON ONAME-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: ONAME ;

LEXICON ONAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: ONAME ;

LEXICON ONAME-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: ONAME ;

LEXICON ONAME
  VNAME ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:           FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub:           RHyph ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:e%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:e%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>m        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>n        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

! the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.


LEXICON ONAME_PLC-ORG
  VNAME_PLC-ORG ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:           FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub:           RHyph ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:e%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:e%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>m        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>n        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

! the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.



LEXICON UENAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: UENAME_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON UENAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: UENAME ;


LEXICON UENAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: UENAME ;


LEXICON UENAME
SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON UENAME_PLC-ORG
SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON UNAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: UNAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON UNAME-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-org
+N+Prop+Org: UNAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON UNAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME
 VNAME ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub: UNAME_EVEN ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

LEXICON UNAME_PLC-ORG
 VNAME_PLC-ORG ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub: UNAME_EVEN ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

LEXICON UNAME_EVEN !SUB (sub lexicon names as well, or the code breaks)
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:          FINAL1 ;  ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub:          RHyph ;  ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:ve%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ve%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ve%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:ve%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:ve%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ve%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM


LEXICON ZEENAME-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: ZEENAME_PLC_ORG ;

LEXICON ZEENAME-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: ZEENAME ;

LEXICON ZEENAME-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: ZEENAME ;

LEXICON ZEENAME
 +Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
 :e          RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Acc:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Gen:e%>i       FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ill:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ine:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:e%>iste    FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com:e%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:e%>ine         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ZEENAME_PLC_ORG
 +Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
 :e          RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Com:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Nom:e%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Acc:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Gen:e%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ill:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ine:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ela:e%>iste    FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Com:e%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +Ess:e%>ine         FINAL1 ;
 +Attr:e FINAL1 ;
